Utah statutes.
62A-15-710.    Restrictions and limitations -- Civil rights and privileges.
(1)  Subject to the specific rules of the division, and except to the extent
that the local mental health authority or its designee, in conjunction with
the child's current treating mental health professional, determines that it is
necessary for the welfare of the person to impose restrictions, every child
committed to the physical custody of a local mental health authority under
Section 62A-15-703 is entitled to:
(a)  communicate, by sealed mail or otherwise, with persons, including
official agencies, inside or outside of the facility;
(b)  receive visitors; and
(c)  exercise his civil rights.
(2)  When any right of a child is limited or denied, the nature, extent, and
reason for that limitation or denial shall be entered in the child's treatment
record.  Any continuing denial or limitation shall be reviewed every 30 days
and shall also be entered in that treatment record.  Notice of that continuing
denial in excess of 30 days shall be sent to the division.
(3)  Notwithstanding any limitations authorized under this section on the
right of communication, each child committed to the physical custody of a
local mental health authority is entitled to communicate by sealed mail with
his attorney, the local mental health authority, its designee, his current
treating mental health professional, and the court, if commitment was court
ordered.  In no case may the child be denied a visit with the legal counsel or
clergy of his choice.
(4)  Each local mental health authority shall provide appropriate and
reasonable means and arrangements for informing children and their parents or
legal guardians of their rights as provided in this part, and for assisting
them in making and presenting requests for release.
(5)  All local mental health facilities shall post a statement, promulgated by
the division, describing patient's rights under Utah law.
